Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.433

Violations—Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of RCW 43.22.431 through 43.22.434 and 43.22.350 or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 43.22.431 through 43.22.434 and 43.22.350 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 21 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—1977 ex.s. c 21: See note following RCW 43.22.431.